Utah statutes.
4-17-3.5.   Creation of State Weed Committee -- Membership -- Powers and
duties -- Expenses.
(1)  There is created a State Weed Committee composed of five members, one
member representing each of the following:
(a)  the Department of Agriculture and Food;
(b)  the Utah State University Agricultural Experiment Station;
(c)  the Utah State University Extension Service;
(d)  the Utah Association of Counties; and
(e)  private agricultural industry.
(2)  The commissioner shall select the members of the committee from those
nominated by each of the respective groups or agencies following approval by
the Agricultural Advisory Board.
(3) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), as terms of current
committee members expire, the commissioner shall appoint each new member or
reappointed member to a four-year term.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the commissioner
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of committee members are staggered so that
approximately half of the committee is appointed every two years.
(4) (a)  Members may be removed by the commissioner for cause.
(b)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(5)  The State Weed Committee shall:
(a)  confer and advise on matters pertaining to the planning, implementation,
and administration of the state noxious weed program;
(b)  recommend names for membership on the committee; and
(c)  serve as members of the executive committee of the Utah Weed Control
Association.
(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
